Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 25 Burial of Veterans

30-25-1.
Firing squad for funerals.

Whenever requested by the family of any honorably discharged, deceased soldier, sailor, airperson, or marine of any of the wars in which the United States has been engaged, or by a veterans’ organization duly authorized to conduct the funeral of the deceased soldier, sailor, airperson, or marine, the adjutant general of the state shall furnish a firing squad, and wherever possible, complete with a bugler to play “Taps”, live and not synthesized or pre-recorded. The bugler may be on active duty or an honorably discharged veteran, for the funeral of the deceased soldier, sailor, airperson, or marine; provided, however, that when the national guard of the state shall have been called, ordered, or drafted into the service of the United States for war or an emergency, the adjutant general shall furnish the firing squad from the first regiment, Rhode Island state guard; and wherever possible, complete with a bugler to play “Taps”, live and not synthesized or pre-recorded. The bugler may be on active duty or an honorably discharged veteran; provided, further, however, that when any member of the armed forces of the United States dies in service and his or her body is brought back to the state for burial, whenever requested by the family of the deceased or by a veterans’ organization duly authorized to conduct the funeral of the deceased member of the armed forces, and it is not possible to arrange with the federal government for a firing squad for the funeral of the deceased member of the armed forces, the adjutant general of the state is authorized and directed to furnish a firing squad, and wherever possible, complete with a bugler to play “Taps”, live and not synthesized or pre-recorded, for the funeral of the deceased member of the armed forces.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2029, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 10; P.L. 1941, ch. 993, § 1; P.L. 1945, ch. 1582, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1878, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2798, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3252, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-1

; P.L. 2006, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 289, § 1.

30-25-2.
Appropriations for firing squads.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such a sum as it may deem necessary, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of §

30-25-1

; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums as may, from time to time, be required upon the receipt by the state controller of proper vouchers, approved by the adjutant general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2029, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-2

.

30-25-3.
Burial at public expense.

Whenever any person who served in the army, navy, air force, or marine corps of the United States during any period of war, and was honorably discharged therefrom, shall die within this state without leaving means sufficient to defray necessary funeral expenses, he or she shall be buried and the expenses thereof paid in the manner provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1904, ch. 1154, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 105, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 117, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-3

.

30-25-4.
Designation of person to conduct burial — Burial by relatives or friends — Maximum allowance.

The town council of any town, and the city council of any city, shall annually designate some proper person, other than those designated by law for the care of paupers or the custody of criminals, who shall cause to be interred the body of any honorably discharged soldier, sailor, airperson, or marine, who may not have left sufficient means to pay his or her funeral expenses; and in case the deceased has relatives or friends who desire to conduct the burial, and who are unable or unwilling to pay the charge thereof, they shall be allowed to conduct the funeral, and the cost of the interment shall be paid to them or their representatives by the town or city treasurer upon due proof; provided, however, that claim for the payment of the burial expenses under the provisions of this chapter shall be made within sixty (60) days after the decease of the honorably discharged soldier, sailor, airperson, or marine; and provided, further, that the whole expense of the funeral shall not in any case exceed the sum of fifty-five dollars ($55.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1904, ch. 1154, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 105, § 2; P.L. 1920, ch. 1843, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 117, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-4

.

30-25-5.
Place of burial — Disinterment from pauper cemetery.

Any interment provided for by the provisions of this chapter shall not be made in any cemetery or plot used exclusively for the pauper dead; and if any deceased honorably discharged soldier, sailor, airperson, or marine may have already died and been buried in any place used exclusively for the burial of paupers, he or she shall be removed therefrom as soon as may be after the attention of the town or city council, within whose limits the person may have been buried, shall have been called thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1904, ch. 1154, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 105, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 117, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-5

.

30-25-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1904, ch. 1154, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 105, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 117, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-6

; Repealed by P.L. 1986, ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 1986.

30-25-7.
Veterans dying in state institutions.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to require the city treasurer of the city of Cranston to pay any money to meet the funeral expenses of, or the erection of any headstone for, any person who shall have died at any of the state institutions in Cranston, unless admitted or committed from that city; but the treasurer of the town or city from which the person was admitted, or from which he or she has been committed, shall be liable for and shall pay the funeral expenses as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1904, ch. 1154, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 105, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 117, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-7

; P.L. 1986, ch. 76, § 2.

30-25-8.
Maintenance of north cemetery.

The director of human services shall be custodian of the Rhode Island soldiers’ burial lots, and the monument and grave markers thereon, located in the north cemetery in the town of Bristol. He or she shall, from time to time, cause such work to be done as may be necessary in keeping the lots, monuments, and markers in good condition and repair.

History of Section.

P.L. 1917, ch. 1486, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 117, § 8; G.L., ch. 117, § 6, as enacted by P.L. 1931, ch. 1730, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-8

; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 6.

30-25-9.
Expenses of north cemetery.

The director of human services is authorized to make such expenditures as may be necessary in carrying out the purposes of §

30-25-8

, and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed upon receipt of proper vouchers approved by the state director of human services, to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums as may be required, from the funds under the control of the director of human services, known as the veterans’ home, restricted account.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 117, § 8, as enacted by P.L. 1931, ch. 1730, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 80; impl. am. P. L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-9

; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 6.

30-25-10.
Care of neglected graves.

The director of human services is authorized and empowered to undertake the care of any grave of any soldier or sailor who fought in the war of the revolution, or who at any time served the United States in any war, when the grave appears to have been neglected or abandoned. For that purpose, the director, and the agents or employees of the division, when duly authorized thereunto by the director, may enter into and upon any public or private cemetery or burial place to clear any grave of grass, weeds, brush, briars, or rubbish; to erect, replace, repair, or renovate fences, memorial stones, or markers; and to perform the other tasks as may be necessary to restore and maintain the grave and its surroundings in a decent and orderly condition.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 117, § 10; P.L. 1928, ch. 1188, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-10

; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 6.

30-25-11.
Consent of custodian of neglected grave.

When any cemetery or burial place containing a neglected grave is found by the director of human services, or the agents or employees of the division, to be under the custody or control of some private owner or public authority, then the director shall obtain permission, in writing, from the person or persons having custody or control before entering into and upon the cemetery or burial place; provided, that if no person or persons can be found having the custody or control of the cemetery or burial place, the director shall assume the right of entry and shall perform the duties specified in §

30-25-10

, without further notice.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 117, § 10; P.L. 1928, ch. 1188, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-11

; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 6.

30-25-12.
Appropriations for care of graves.

The general assembly shall, from time to time, appropriate such sums as it may deem necessary to be expended by the director of human services in carrying out the purposes of §§

30-25-10

and

30-25-11

, and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed, upon the receipt of the proper vouchers approved by the director, to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sums as may be required, within the amount appropriated therefor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 117, § 11; P.L. 1928, ch. 1188, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, §§ 65, 80; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-12

; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 6.

30-25-13.
Acceptance and administration of gifts.

The director of human services may accept in the name of the state, and may administer, any devise, bequest, or gift that is to be expended for the general purposes of this chapter. All sums received by devise, bequest, or gift from any person or corporation shall be deposited with the general treasurer, and by him or her kept in a special fund, to be known as “the veterans’ cemetery fund”, and held subject to the order of the director.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 117, § 11; P.L. 1928, ch. 1188, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 655, § 12, impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 80; impl. am. P.L. 1949, ch. 2166, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-25-13

; P.L. 1986, ch. 76, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 6; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 47.

30-25-14.
Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery.

The Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery, located on the grounds of the Joseph H. Ladd school in the town of Exeter, shall be under the management and control of the director of the department of human services. The director of the department of human services shall appoint an administrator for the Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery who shall be an honorably discharged veteran of the United States Armed Forces and shall have the general supervision over, and shall prescribe rules for, the government and management of the cemetery. He or she shall make all needful rules and regulations governing the operation of the cemetery and generally may do all things necessary to ensure the successful operation thereof. The director shall promulgate rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the provisions of 38 U.S.C. § 2402, to govern the eligibility for burial in the Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery. In addition to all persons eligible for burial pursuant to rules and regulations established by the director, any person who served in the army, navy, air force, or marine corps of the United States for a period of not less than two (2) years and whose service was terminated honorably, shall be eligible for burial in the Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery. The director shall appoint and employ all subordinate officials and persons needed for the proper management of the cemetery. National guard members who are killed in the line of duty or who are honorably discharged after completion of at least twenty (20) years’ of service in the Rhode Island national guard and their spouse shall be eligible for interment in the Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery. For the purpose of computing service under this section, honorable service in the active forces or reserves shall be considered toward the twenty (20) years of national guard service. The general assembly shall make an annual appropriation to the department of human services to provide for the operation and maintenance for the cemetery. The director shall charge and collect a grave liner fee per interment of the eligible spouse and/or eligible dependents of the qualified veteran equal to the department’s cost for the grave liner.

No domestic animal shall be allowed on the grounds of the Rhode Island veterans’ memorial cemetery, whether at large or under restraint, except for seeing eye guide dogs, hearing ear signal dogs or any other service animal, as required by federal law or any personal assistance animal, as required by chapter 9.1 of title 40. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500).

The state of Rhode Island office of veterans services shall bear the cost of all tolls incurred by any motor vehicles that are part of a veteran’s funeral procession, originating from Aquidneck Island ending at the veterans’ memorial cemetery, for burial or internment. The executive director of the turnpike and bridge authority shall assist in the administration and coordination of this toll reimbursement program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 161, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 427, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 21, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 293, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 403, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 14; P.L. 2009, ch. 233, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 234, § 4; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 6; P.L. 2016, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 47; P.L. 2018, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 95, § 1.